pl: Konfiguracja fletu: B połączenie stopowe; Zamknięty otwór (plateau); Rzędowe G; Przesunięcie G; Otwarty otwór (francuski); Inne
fr: Configuration de la flûte: Articulation du pied B; Trou fermé (plateau); Sol accordé; Offset-D; Trou ouvert (français); Autre
zh-CN: 排屑槽配置: B 调音孔; 封闭孔（平台）; 直排 G 键; 偏移 G 键; 开孔（法式）; 其他
tr: Flüt konfigürasyonu: B footjoint; Kapalı delik (plato); Satır içi G; Ofset G; Açık delik (Fransızca); Diğer
zh-TW: 長笛配置: B 尾管; 閉孔式; 直列 G; 曲列式 G; 開孔式; 其他
pt-BR: Configuração da flauta: Articulação do pé B; Buraco fechado (platô); Mi; Deslocamento de Fá; Buraco aberto (francês); Outro
it: Configurazione del flauto: Discendente al Si; Foro chiuso (plateau); Sol in linea; Sol fuori linea; Foro aperto (francese); Altro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia flauty: B pätka; Uzavretý otvor (plató); Rovná hlavica; Zahnutá hlavica; Otvorený otvor (francúzsky); Iné
ja: フルートの構成: Bフットジョイント; クローズドホール (プラトー); インラインG; オフセットG; オープンホール (フレンチ); その他
fi: Huilun konfiguraatio: B footjoint; Suljettu reikä (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Avoin reikä (ranskalainen); Muu
ko: 플루트 구성: B 풋조인트; 클로즈드 홀(고원); 인라인 G; 오프셋 G; 오픈 홀(프렌치); 기타
cs: Konfigurace flétny: B-noha; Uzavřené otvory (plateau); Inline G; Odsazené G; Otevřený otvor (francouzský); Jiné
ro-RO: Configurație flaut: Articulație picior în Si; Design închis (platou); Taste în linie flaut în sol; Taste decalate flaut în sol; Design deschis (francez); Altele
sv: Flöjtkonfiguration: B footjoint; Stängt hål (platå); Inline G; Offset-G; Öppet hål (franska); Övrigt
sl-SI: Konfiguracija flavte: B-noga; Zaprta zaklopka (plato); V liniji; Odmaknjena tipka G; Odprta zaklopka (francoska); Drugo
pt-PT: Configuração da flauta: Articulação de pé B; Buraco fechado (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Buraco aberto (francês); Outro
vi: Cấu hình sáo: B footjoint; Lỗ kín (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Lỗ mở (kiểu Pháp); Khác
hr-HR: Konfiguracija flaute: B-foot; Zatvoreni sistem (plato); Inline G; Offset G; Otvoreni sistem (francuska); Ostalo
de: Flötenkonfiguration: B-Fußstück; Geschlossenes Loch (Plateau); Inline-G; Offset-G; Offenes Loch (Französisch); Sonstiges
ru: Конфигурация флейты: B-образное соединение; Закрытое отверстие (плато); Встроенный G; Смещение G; Открытое отверстие (французский); Другой
da: Fløjtekonfiguration: B-fodled; Lukket hul (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Åbent hul (fransk); Andet
es: Configuración de la flauta: B footjoint; Llave cerrada (plateau); G en línea; G desplazado; Llave abierta (francés); Otros
hu: Fuvola beállítása: B hangolás; Zárt billentyűs (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Nyitott billentyűs (francia); Egyéb
en: Flute configuration: B footjoint; Closed hole (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Open hole (French); Other
nl: Fluitconfiguratie: B footjoint; Gesloten gat (plateau); Inline G; Offset G; Open gat (Frans); Andere
nb: Fløytekonfigurasjon: B-fotledd; Lukket hull (platå); G-streng; Offset-G; Åpent hull (fransk); Annet
el: Διαμόρφωση φλάουτου: Β κλείδωση; Κλειστή οπή (πλατό); Inline G; Offset-D; Ανοιχτή οπή (γαλλικό); Άλλο
lt-LT: Fleitos konfigūracija: B galvutės jungtis; Uždara skylė (plateau); Tiesi G; Iškili G; Atvira skylė (prancūziška); Kita
th: รูปร่างภายนอกของฟลูต: คีย์ต่ำสุด B; แบบ Closed hole (plateau); อินไลน์ G; ออฟเซ็ต G; แบบ Open hole (ฝรั่งเศส); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конфигурация на флейта: B footjoint; Затворена дупка (плато); Inline G; Offset G; Отворена дупка (френска); Други